Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
HARDSHIP SET-ASIDE AND ALLOCATION OF PETROLEUM

PRODUCTS
DURING A SHORTAGE

§125C-21 Definitions. "Petroleum
product" means heating oils, light and heavy diesel oil, motor gasoline,
propane, butane, residual fuel oils, kerosene, and aviation fuels used for
emergency and essential intrastate air transport services, but excluding all
other aviation fuels.

"Prime supplier" means any
individual, trustee, agency, partnership, association, corporation, company,
municipality, political subdivision or other legal entity which makes the first
sale of any liquid fossil fuel into the state distribution system for
consumption within the State. [L 1984, c 238, pt of §7; am L 1994, c 59, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next